GRAMMARS/HUNGARIAN/FST/src/map4xip.xfst
define LEX

define EPS	"*EPS*" ;

read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG ;

read regex SIG & [ %+ ?+] ;
multi char sigma net
define TAG


# compounds
define MAP1 [ 
          TAG -> EPS || _ $["^CB+"]
.o.	  "^CB+" -> %#
];

# derivations 
define MAP2 [
       %+Noun  -> "+DNoun" || _ "^DB"
.o.    %+Adj   -> "+DAdj"  || _ "^DB"
.o.    %+Verb  -> "+DVerb" || _ "^DB"
.o.   "^DB" -> EPS
];


read regex [ MAP1.i .o. LEX ];
define LEX

read regex [ MAP2.i .o. LEX ];

# boundary
substitute symbol "#" for "^|" ;

# superlative marker and other prefixes
substitute symbol "#" for "+Super+" ;
substitute symbol "#" for "+Prefix+" ;

set minimal off
substitute symbol 0 for "*EPS*" ;


set quit-on-fail on


optimize net
